Maryland, session 2026, HB0758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–804.
(a) [(1)] The Secretary shall make grants from or agreements for the use of State
funds, including the funds provided under § 9–1A–33 of the State Government Article, and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0758*

HOUSE BILL 758
federal funds to help public agencies or nonprofit organizations operate the network of
clinically appropriate services for problem gamblers who reside in the State to provide the
following:
[(i)] (1) Inpatient and residential services;
[(ii)] (2) Outpatient services;
[(iii)] (3) Intensive outpatient services;
[(iv)] (4) Continuing care services;
[(v)] (5) Educational services;
[(vi)] (6) Services for victims of domestic violence; and
[(vii)] (7) Other preventive or rehabilitative services or treatment.
[(2) Research and training that are designed to improve or extend these
services are proper items of expense.]
Article – State Government
9–1A–33.
(b) (1) (i) There is a Problem Gambling Fund in the Maryland Department
of Health.
(ii) The purpose of the Fund is primarily to provide funding for
problem gambling treatment and prevention programs, including:
1. inpatient and residential services;
2. outpatient services;
3. intensive outpatient services;
4. continuing care services;
5. educational services;
6. services for victims of domestic violence; and
7. other preventive or rehabilitative services or treatment.

HOUSE BILL 758 3
(2) The Problem Gambling Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not
subject to § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) Money in the Problem Gambling Fund shall be invested and reinvested
by the Treasurer, and interest and earnings shall accrue to the Fund.
(4) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, expenditures
from the Problem Gambling Fund shall be made only by the Maryland Department of
Health to:
(i) establish a 24–hour hotline for compulsive and problem gamblers
and to provide counseling and other support services for compulsive and problem gamblers;
(ii) establish an outreach program for compulsive and problem
gamblers, including individuals who requested placement on the voluntary exclusion list
established by the Commission under § 9–1A–24 of this subtitle, for the purpose of
participating in problem gambling treatment and prevention programs;
(iii) develop and implement free or reduced cost problem gambling
treatment and prevention programs, including the programs established under Title 19,
Subtitle 8 of the Health – General Article; [and]
(iv) develop and implement free or reduced cost problem gambling
treatment and prevention programs targeted at individuals with problem gambling issues
related to sports wagering, participation in fantasy competitions, and other forms of
wagering, whether legal or illegal, conducted in the State or through online means; AND
(V) PROVIDE REIMBURSEMENT TO SUPPORT PEERS PROVIDING
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES TO INDIVIDUALS WITH PROBLEM GAMBLING ISSUES
WHO ARE RECEIVING TREATMENT OR PARTICIPATING IN PREVENTION PROGRAMS
DESCRIBED UNDER ITEMS (III) AND (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(5) After satisfying the requirements of paragraph (4) of this subsection,
any unspent funds in the Problem Gambling Fund may be expended by the Maryland
Department of Health on drug and other addiction treatment services.
(6) Expenditures from the Problem Gambling Fund shall be made in
accordance with an appropriation approved by the General Assembly in the annual State
budget or by the budget amendment procedure provided for in § 7–209 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.